Utah statutes.
13-38a-202.   Limitation on information contained in receipts.

(1)  A person that accepts a financial transaction card for the transaction of business may not, on a financial transaction card receipt:

(a)  print more than the last five digits of the financial transaction card account number; or

(b)  print the financial transaction card expiration date.

(2) (a)  This section applies only to receipts that are electronically printed.

(b)  This section does not apply to transactions in which the initial means of recording the financial transaction card number is by:

(i)  handwriting; or

(ii)  an imprint or copy of the financial transaction card.



Enacted by Chapter 421, 2013 General Session

